test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VT-mesj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - мэсь: # Verb 'to take' - partial paradigm
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: мэв
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: мэр
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: мэда
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: мэмиʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: мэриʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: мэдиʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: мэваˮ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: мэраˮ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: мэдоʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: мэӈахаюн
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: мэӈахаюд
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: мэӈахаюда
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: мэӈахаюниʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: мэӈахаюдиʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: мэӈахаюдиʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: мэӈахаюнаˮ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: мэӈахаюдаˮ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: мэӈахаюдоʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: мэян
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: мэяд
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: мэйда
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: мэйниʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: мэйдиʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: мэйдиʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: мэйнаˮ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: мэйдаˮ
     мэсь+V+TV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: мэйдоʼ
     мэсь+V+TV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мэӈгу
     мэсь+V+TV+ConNeg: мыˮ
     мэсь+V+TV+Fut+ConNeg: мэӈгуˮ
